District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.25a

Accessibility of digital dispatch for individuals with disabilities.

(a)

By January 1, 2016, a company that provides digital dispatch shall:

(1)

Ensure that the company’s websites and mobile applications are accessible to the blind and visually impaired and the deaf and hard of hearing; and

(2)

Provide a report to the Council’s Committee on Transportation and the Environment, or its successor committee with oversight of for-hire vehicles, on how the company intends to increase access to wheelchair-accessible public or private vehicle-for-hire service to individuals with disabilities.

(b)

A company that provides digital dispatch shall not:

(1)

Impose additional or special charges on an individual with a disability for providing services to accommodate the individual; or

(2)

Require an individual with a disability to be accompanied by an attendant.

(c)

If an operator accepts a ride request through digital dispatch from a passenger with a disability who uses a mobility device, upon picking up the passenger, the operator shall stow the passenger’s mobility equipment in the vehicle if the vehicle is capable of stowing the equipment. If a passenger or operator determines that the vehicle is not capable of stowing the equipment, the company that provides digital dispatch shall not charge a trip cancellation fee or, if such fee is charged, shall provide the passenger with a refund in a timely manner.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20f-1
as added Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-197, § 2(h), 61 DCR 12430

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-197: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-197 provided, in part, that §§ 1, 2, 3, and 4 of the act shall apply as of March 10, 2015.